Utah statutes.
36-2-3.   Salaries of members set by Legislature based on recommendations of
Legislative Compensation Commission.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (2), (3), or (4), the salaries of
members of the Legislature shall automatically be set beginning January 1st of
each odd-numbered year at the amount recommended by the Legislative
Compensation Commission in the last report issued by the commission in the
preceding even-numbered year.
(b)  This salary recommendation shall be based on either:
(i)  a daily basis:
(A)  for each calendar day for annual general sessions; and
(B)  for each day a legislator attends veto-override and special sessions and
other authorized legislative meetings; or
(ii)  an annualized salary.
(c)  In preparing its report, the commission may recommend salary amounts
that:
(i)  take into account the amounts received by legislators for legislative
expenses; and
(ii)  provide alternative salary amounts based upon the occurrence of various
contingencies.
(2) (a)  During an even-numbered annual general session or special session in
the year immediately preceding the effective date of any salary change, the
Legislature may reject or decrease the salary recommendation, but may not
increase the salary recommendation.
(b)  If the Legislature does not act as provided in Subsection (2)(a), they
have by law accepted the Legislative Compensation Commission's recommendations
contained in the last report issued by the commission in the preceding even-
numbered year.
(3)  Unless the commission issues a revised report after March 11, 2010, and
notwithstanding Subsection (2), the salary for a member of the Legislature
through calendar year 2011 is $117 per day for each calendar day that the
legislator attends:
(a)  the annual general session;
(b)  a veto-override session;
(c)  a special session; or
(d)  an authorized legislative meeting.
(4)  If the last report issued by the commission in an even-numbered year
recommends a salary contingent upon certain action being taken by the
Legislature, that contingent legislative salary:
(a)  takes effect on the day after the day that the contingent action is taken
by the Legislature; and
(b)  supersedes any other salary in effect as of January 1.
